Connecticut, session 2026, HB05302.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
2 Social Services shall increase the asset limit for the HUSKY C health
3 program, as defined in section 17b-290 of the general statutes, for (1) an
4 unmarried person from one thousand six hundred dollars to five
5 thousand dollars, and (2) married persons from two thousand four
6 hundred dollars to seven thousand five hundred dollars.
7 (b) Not later than July 1, 2027, the commissioner shall file a report, in
8 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
9 with the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
10 cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
11 agencies, human services and aging on (1) the number of persons
12 eligible for the HUSKY C health program for the prior fiscal year, and
13 (2) any increased costs incurred by the state that are attributable to
14 changes in the asset limits.
HB5302 / File No. 95 1

HB5302 File No. 95
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
AGE Joint Favorable
HB5302 / File No. 95 2

HB5302 File No. 95
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost/Revenue Gain See Below See Below
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS)
due to increasing the asset limit for purposes of HUSKY C eligibility.
The bill increases the asset limit to $5,000 from $1,600 for individuals
and to $7,500 from $2,400 for married couples.
The disposition of assets for the eligible expansion population is
unknown. For context, if HUSKY C enrollment increases by 5%, the state
will experience increased Medicaid costs of approximately $14.5 million
in FY 27 and $46.2 million in FY 28. This assumes a gradual increase in
enrollment of 4,250 individuals over two years.
The state will incur additional administrative costs of approximately
$1.5 million in FY 27 and $100,000 in FY 28 to modify the eligibility
system and support increased enrollment. Increased system costs result
in an associated federal grants revenue gain of approximately $600,000.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to Medicaid enrollment associated with
increased asset limits.
HB5302 / File No. 95 3

HB5302 File No. 95
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5302
AN ACT CONCERNING ASSET LIMITS FOR HUSKY C
BENEFICIARIES.